Utah statutes.
59-10-1002.1.   Removal of tax credit from tax return and prohibition on
claiming or carrying forward a tax credit -- Conditions for removal and
prohibition on claiming or carrying forward a tax credit -- Commission
reporting requirements.
(1)  As used in this section, "tax return" means a tax return filed in
accordance with this chapter.
(2)  Beginning two taxable years after the requirements of Subsection (3) are
met:
(a)  the commission shall remove a tax credit allowed under this part from
each tax return on which the tax credit appears; and
(b)  a claimant, estate, or trust filing a tax return may not claim or carry
forward the tax credit.
(3)  The commission shall remove a tax credit allowed under this part from a
tax return and a claimant, estate, or trust filing a tax return may not claim
or carry forward the tax credit as provided in Subsection (2) if:
(a)  the total amount of the tax credit claimed or carried forward by all
claimants, estates, or trusts filing tax returns is less than $10,000 per year
for three consecutive taxable years beginning on or after January 1, 2002; and
(b)  less than ten claimants, estates, and trusts per year for the three
consecutive taxable years described in Subsection (3)(a), file a tax return
claiming or carrying forward the tax credit.
(4)  The commission shall, on or before the November interim meeting of the
year after the taxable year in which the requirements of Subsection (3) are
met:
(a)  report to the Revenue and Taxation Interim Committee that in accordance
with this section:
(i)  the commission is required to remove a tax credit from each tax return on
which the tax credit appears; and
(ii)  a claimant, estate, or trust filing a tax return may not claim or carry
forward the tax credit; and
(b)  notify each state agency required by statute to assist in the
administration of the tax credit that in accordance with this section:
(i)  the commission is required to remove a tax credit from each tax return on
which the tax credit appears; and
(ii)  a claimant, estate, or trust filing a tax return may not claim or carry
forward the tax credit.
